Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2860.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose. To prevent tobacco-related diseases and diminish tobacco use, the
department of health shall implement a tobacco control program that incorporates evidence-based
best practices for tobacco prevention and cessation.
SECTION 2. Chapter 23-1 of the General Laws entitled "Department of Health" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-1-59. Tobacco control program.
(a) The department of health (“the department”) shall conduct statewide surveillance of
tobacco-related behaviors, knowledge, attitudes, and periodically evaluate the progress of the
department's tobacco control programs, in reducing tobacco use. Benchmark rates could include:
the adult smoking prevalence rate from the 2024 benchmark rate of nine and nine-tenths percent
(9.9%), youth tobacco use rate from the 2023 benchmark rate of seventeen and one-third percent
(17.3%) and youth e-cigarette rate of sixteen and one-half percent (16.5%).
(b) The department shall conduct an ongoing public awareness of tobacco related diseases
program, by developing an information campaign using a variety of media approaches. Any media
campaign funded under the tobacco control program shall stress the importance of both preventing
the initiation of tobacco use and quitting tobacco use and shall be based on professional market
research and surveys, necessary to determine the most effective method of diminishing tobacco use
among specified target population and/or demonstrated effectiveness campaigns used in other
states.

(c) The department shall award and administer grants for projects directed at preventing
and reducing the use of tobacco and tobacco-related diseases. The purpose of the grant program is
to conduct health education and promotion activities and tobacco cessation and enforcement
programs, designed to reduce the number of people beginning to use tobacco, continuing to use
tobacco, or developing tobacco related diseases. In awarding grants, the department shall select a
variety of projects and grantees, consider the current availability of similar services and the need
to target resources to programs serving populations at high risk of starting tobacco use or
developing tobacco related diseases.
(d) The department shall evaluate and assess efficacy for each component of the Rhode
Island tobacco control program. This evaluation shall be submitted annually to the general
assembly and the director of the department of health.
(e)(1) Commencing with fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2026, funding for
subsection (e)(2) of this section shall consist of an amount equal to the greater of:
(i) Five percent (5%) of the total revenues collected annually from chapter 20 of title 44
("cigarette and other tobacco products tax") and chapter 20.2 of title 44 ("little cigar tax"); or
(ii) Three million two hundred thousand dollars ($3,200,000), with an additional five
percent (5%) increase year-over-year to meet the Centers for Disease Control recommended
funding level for tobacco control and prevention in Rhode Island.
(2) The amounts referenced in this subsection shall be directed to the tobacco control
program at the department of health to fund tobacco control initiatives and implement evidence-
based programs for tobacco prevention and cessation and that align with the goals of preventing
youth initiation of tobacco usage, reducing exposure to secondhand smoke, and promoting
cessation. The funding shall be spent in accordance with evidence-based best practices for tobacco
prevention and cessation.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005853
========
LC005853 - Page 2 of 3